District of Columbia statutes.
16-2804

Unknown defendant or unlicensed defendant.

(a)

Section 16-2802 shall not apply to:

(1)

Any intended defendant whose name is unknown or who was not licensed at the time of the alleged occurrence or is unlicensed at the time notice is given;

(2)

Any claim that is unknown to the person at the time of filing his or her notice; or

(3)

Any intended defendant who is identified in the notice by a misnomer.

(b)

Nothing indicated herein shall prevent the court from waiving the requirements of § 16-2802 upon a showing of good faith effort to comply or if the interests of justice dictate.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807